Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Subarticle E. General Provisions.

§ 23-15-751.
Penalties for offenses by registrar or commissioner of elections or officers taking affidavits.

If any registrar or commissioner of elections shall refuse or neglect to perform any of the duties prescribed by Sections 23-15-621 through 23-15-735, or shall knowingly permit any person to sign a false affidavit or otherwise knowingly permit any person to violate Sections 23-15-621 through 23-15-735, or shall violate any of the provisions thereof, or if any officer taking the affidavits as provided in said acts shall make any false statement in his certificate thereto attached, he shall, upon conviction, be deemed guilty of a crime and shall be punished by a fine not exceeding One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or by imprisonment in the Penitentiary not exceeding one (1) year, and shall be removed from office.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-9-701 [Codes, 1942, § 3203-601; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, § 601; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 344]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 237; Laws, 1993, ch. 528, § 15, eff from and after August 16, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment of this section).

§ 23-15-753.
Penalties for vote fraud.

Any person who willfully, unlawfully and feloniously procures, seeks to procure, or seeks to influence the vote of any person voting by absentee ballot, by the payment of money, the promise of payment of money, or by the delivery of any other item of value or promise to give the voter any item of value, or by promising or giving the voter any favor or reward in an effort to influence his vote, or any person who aids, abets, assists, encourages, helps, or causes any person voting an absentee ballot to violate any provision of law pertaining to absentee voting, or any person who sells his vote for money, favor, or reward, has been paid or promised money, a reward, a favor or favors, or any other item of value, or any person who shall willfully swear falsely to any affidavit provided for in Sections 23-15-621 through 23-15-735, shall be guilty of the crime of “vote fraud” and, upon conviction, shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail for no more than one (1) year, or by both fine and imprisonment, or by being sentenced to the State Penitentiary for not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years.

It shall be unlawful for any person who pays or compensates another person for assisting voters in marking their absentee ballots to base the pay or compensation on the number of absentee voters assisted or the number of absentee ballots cast by persons who have received the assistance. Any person who violates this section, upon conviction shall, be fined not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or imprisoned in the Penitentiary not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years, or both.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-9-703 [Codes, 1942, § 3203-602; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, § 602; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 344]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 238; Laws, 1993, ch. 528, § 16; Laws, 1999, ch. 420, § 6, eff from and after June 17, 1999 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 23-15-755.
Applicability of Sections 23-15-621 through 23-15-735.

All of the provisions of Sections 23-15-621 through 23-15-735 shall be applicable, insofar as possible, to municipal, primary, preferential, general and special elections, and wherever herein any duty is imposed or any power or authority is conferred upon the county registrar, county election commissioners, or county executive committee with reference to a state and county election, such duty shall likewise be imposed and such power and authority shall likewise be conferred upon the municipal registrar, municipal election commission or municipal executive committee with reference to any municipal election. Any duty, obligation or responsibility imposed upon the registrar or upon the election commissioners, when applicable, shall likewise be conferred upon and devolved upon the appropriate party, executive committee or officials in any party primary.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-9-705 [Codes, 1942, § 3203-603; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, § 603; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 344]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 239; Laws, 1993, ch. 528, § 17, eff from and after August 16, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment of this section).